tests/verbs-TAI.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../unm.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../unm.automorf.hfst

Tests:                          
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":           #possibly change the 1p for example to object because that is
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nemilukw    #how it is referred to in grammar
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nemilkuk
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : neyùkw  #"ù" added in above
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nehkuk 
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nulhalukw
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nulhalkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kemilukw
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemilkuk
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : keneyùkw
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kenehkuk
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kulhalukw
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kulhalkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : mwilku
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : mwilku
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : weneku
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : wenekuk
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : wulhalku
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : wulhalku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nemilkuna
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nemilkunanak
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nehkuna
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nehkunanak
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nulhalkuna
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nulhalkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kemilkuna
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kemilkunanak
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kenehkuna
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kenehkunanak
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kulhalkuna
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kulhalkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemilkuwa
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kemilkuwaok
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kenehkuwa
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kenehkuwaok #"wook" written but then "-waok" written in beside it
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kulhalkuwa
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kulhaluwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch14) tv.aa.inv p3.s_pl":
    mil<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_pl>: mwilkuwoo
    new<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_pl> : wenekuwoo
    ulhal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_pl> : wulhalkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntaholukw
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntaholkuk
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : mpeshukw
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : mpeshkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : newichema
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : newichemaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntaxama
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntaxamaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktaholukw
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktaholkuk
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kpeshukw
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kewichema
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewichemaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktaxamukw
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktaxamkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : toholku
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : toholkuk
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : pweshku
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : pweshku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : wichemku
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : wichemku
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : toxamku
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : toxamku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntaholkuna
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntaholkunanak
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpeshkuna
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpeshkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newichemawena
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newichemawenanak
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntaxamkuna
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntaxamkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : ktaholawena
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : ktaholawenanak
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpeshkuna
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpeshkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kewichemawena
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kewichemawenanak
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : ktaxamawena
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : ktaxamawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktaholawa
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktaholawaok
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpeshkuwa
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpeshkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewichemukuwa
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kewichemukuwaok
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktaxamkuwa
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktaxamkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch17) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    ahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : toholawoo
    pesh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : pweshkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch18) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : wichemawao
    xam<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : toxamkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntelekw
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntelkuk
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntahelekw
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntahelkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : newichemukw
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : newichemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktelekw
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktelkuk
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktahelekw
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktahelkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kewichemukw
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewichemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : telku
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : telku
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : tohelku
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : tohelku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : wichemku
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : wichemku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntelkuna
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntelkunanak
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntahelkuna
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntahelkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newichemekuna
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newichemekunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : ktelkuna
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : ktelkunanak
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : ktahelkuna
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : ktahelkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kewichemekuna
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kewichemekunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktelkuwa
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktelkuwaok
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktahelkuwa
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktahelkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewichemkuwa
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kewichemkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch19) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    tel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : telkuwoo
    ahel<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : tohelkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch20) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    wichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : wichemkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : newixenkukw
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : newixenkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kewixenkukw
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewixenkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : wixenku
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : wixenku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newixenkuna
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newixenkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kewixenkuna
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kewixenkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewixenkuwa
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kewixenkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch22) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : wixenkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nuwahukw
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nuwahkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kuwahukw
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kuwahkuk
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : uwahku
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : uwahku

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nuwahkuna
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nuwahkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kuwahkuna
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kuwahkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kuwahkuwa
    uwah<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kuwahkuwa  

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch23) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    wixen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : uwahaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    moho<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nemuhokw
    moho<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nemohokuk
    oshim<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : noshimakw
    oshim<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : noshimkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    kox<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkoxakw
    kox<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkoxkuk
    aken<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntakenakw
    aken<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntakenkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 1) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    moho<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kemuhokw
    moho<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemohokuk
    oshim<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : koshimakw
    oshim<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : koshimkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 2) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    kox<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : koxakw
    kox<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : koxkuk
    aken<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktakenakw
    aken<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktakenkuk
